Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 10 Arkansas Local Police And Fire Retirement System
24-10-405. Employer accumulation account — Contributions.

The employer accumulation account as created by this section shall be the account into which contributions made by employers for annuities shall be accumulated and from which transfers shall be made as provided in this chapter.

Employer contributions paid to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System provided for in this section shall be credited to the employer accumulation fund account of the employer making the contributions.

When an annuity becomes due and payable to or on behalf of a member, there shall be transferred to the retirement reserve account from his or her employer's account in the employer accumulation account the difference between the reserve for the annuity and the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at the time the annuity first becomes due and payable.

An employer accumulation account shall be maintained to receive and hold employer contributions.

Paid service employer contributions to the system shall be the total of the contribution amounts provided for in subsections (f) and (g) of this section, and the contributions shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (h) of this section.

For paid service employers, the actuary shall annually compute the rate of contributions, expressed as a percent of active member pays, which will cover the benefit costs of paid service employees participating in the system.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System in consultation with the actuary shall establish, based upon their financial assumptions, the actuarial valuation determining the contribution rate.

The board shall certify annually to the governing body of each employer the contribution rate so determined, and each employer shall pay contributions based on that rate to the system during the employer's next fiscal year, which begins six (6) months or more after the date of the board certification.

The payments shall be made in such manner and form, and in such frequency, and shall be accompanied by such supporting data, as the board shall determine.

When received, the payments shall be credited to the employer accumulation account.

Each employer shall provide its share as determined by the board of the administrative expenses of the system and shall pay that amount to the system to be credited to the income-expense account.

Except under subdivision (h)(2) of this section, the paid service employer's total contributions to the system, expressed as a percentage of active member pays, in any employer fiscal year beginning with the second fiscal year that the political subdivision is an employer shall not exceed its total contributions for the immediately preceding fiscal year, expressed as a percent of active member pays, by more than one percent (1%).

However, an increase in the paid service employer's contributions to the system may exceed the limit of one percent (1%) per year imposed under subdivision (h)(1) of this section if the board certifies to the governing body of each paid service employer that the increase in the paid service employer's contribution rate is the direct result of increased benefit costs mandated by changes in the law made by the General Assembly.

For volunteer service employers, the actuary shall annually compute the rate of contributions that will cover the benefit costs of volunteer service employees participating in the system as determined by policy established by the board.

The actuarial valuation determination of the contribution rate shall be based upon financial assumptions established by the board following consultation with the actuary.

The board shall certify annually to the governing body of each employer the determined contribution rate, and each employer shall pay contributions based on the determined rate to the system during the employer's next fiscal year that begins six (6) months or more from the date of the board certification.

The board shall determine required supporting data and the manner, form, and frequency in which payments shall be made.

The board shall establish necessary additional policies regarding volunteer service employers that are required to meet the financial objective of the system under this subchapter.

Beginning in fiscal year 2012, for each paid service employer the actuary shall annually compute the rate of contributions that will cover the benefit costs of its employees participating in the system as determined by policy established by the board.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806; Acts 2003, No. 1368, § 1; 2007, No. 610, § 1; 2011, No. 979, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (j).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a) and (b); deleted “first” preceding “becomes due” in (c); rewrote (d); substituted “Paid service employer” for “Each paid service employer's” in (e); in (f)(1), substituted “paid service employers” for “each paid service employer” and “paid service” for “its”; rewrote (f)(2); substituted “certify annually” for “annually certify” in (f)(3); deleted “employer's account in the” preceding “employer” in (f)(5); substituted “percentage” for “percent” in (h)(1); and rewrote (i)(1).

24-10-406. Retirement reserve account.

The retirement reserve account, as created by this section, shall be the fund into which shall be made transfers as provided in this chapter and from which shall be paid to retirants and beneficiaries the annuities provided by the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806.

24-10-407. Income-expense account.

The income-expense account, as created by this section, shall be the account to which shall be credited all investment income from invested assets of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, in which shall be accumulated the contributions made by employers for the administrative expenses of the system, from which shall be made annual transfers of regular interest to the other accounts of the system, and from which shall be paid all the expenses of the system necessary for the administration and operation of the system.

When paid to the system, the employer contributions provided for in § 24-10-405(g) shall be credited to the income-expense account.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System may accept gifts and bequests, which shall be credited to the income-expense account, along with all other moneys received by the system the disposition of which is not specifically provided for in this chapter.

At the end of each system fiscal year, the board shall credit each member's individual account in the members' deposit account with regular interest on the average balance in the account for the fiscal year.

Beginning July 1, 2013, the board shall cease awarding interest to each member's deposit account.

At the end of each system fiscal year, the board shall credit to the employer accumulation account regular interest on the average balance in the account for the fiscal year and similarly shall credit regular interest to the retirement reserve account.

The regular interest shall be transferred from the income-expense account.

Whenever the board determines that the balance in the income-expense account is more than sufficient to cover the current charges to the account, the board by resolution may provide for contingency reserves, or for the transfer of the excess, or portions thereof, to cover the needs of the other accounts of the system.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806; Acts 2013, No. 40, § 4; 2013, No. 1065, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment by No. 40 deleted “each account in” preceding “the employer” in (d)(2).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1065 added the (d)(1)(A) designation and added (d)(1)(B).

24-10-408. State contributions — System administrative expenses.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the state shall not contribute to finance the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System, except those amounts which the political subdivision may receive under laws providing for a general apportionment of political subdivision moneys throughout the state.

The system administrative expenses provided by employer contributions and by system investment return shall not exceed a total of one-half of one percent (0.5%) of active member pays plus one percent (1%) of system assets.

Because the system is covering future hires and not present employees, it will be a few years until the system has grown enough that the administrative expense maximum specified in subsection (b) of this section will cover all system administrative expenses. Until the inevitable growth has occurred, the portion of system administrative expenses not covered by that maximum amount shall be paid from the revenues derived from the premium taxes levied on foreign insurers by the Arkansas Insurance Code or any other funds designated for support of firefighters' pension funds and police officers' pension funds in political subdivisions.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Arkansas Insurance Code, referred to in this section, was originally enacted by Acts 1959, No. 148.
Acts 1959, No. 148 is codified as set out in the note following § 23-60-101.

24-10-409. Proration of state revenues between political subdivision and its relief fund.

For each political subdivision with a relief fund in effect, the relief fund has been receiving revenues from the state derived from the taxes levied on foreign and domestic insurers by the Arkansas Insurance Code, and §§ 24-11-301, 24-11-801 — 24-11-807, 24-11-809, 24-11-813 — 24-11-816, 24-11-818 — 24-11-820, 26-57-601 — 26-57-605, and 26-57-607 or any other state funds designated for support of fire and police retirement programs in political subdivisions.

Those state revenues shall be prorated between the relief fund and the political subdivision based upon the total number of members active and retired and beneficiaries covered by the relief fund and by the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

However, the amount allocated:

To the political subdivision shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the cost as calculated under § 24-11-214(e)(8); and

To the local pension and relief fund shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the cost as calculated under § 24-11-214(e)(7).

In the case of multiple beneficiaries of a single deceased member, those individuals shall be counted as one (1) for purposes of this section.

If there is a mixture of employees acquiring paid service and employees acquiring volunteer service, one (1) paid service employee shall be equal to five (5) volunteer service employees for prorating purposes.

Each political subdivision without a relief fund in effect July 1, 1981, which subsequently covers its fire or police department under the system shall also receive insurance revenues.

Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, all moneys received by the political subdivisions shall be applied to the employer contribution required to support this system.

If there is any money remaining after the subsidy account balance has been exhausted, as calculated by the actuary for the Arkansas Fire and Police Pension Review Board, the governing body of the political subdivision may transfer any or all of the excess moneys to the governing body's policemen's pension and relief fund or firemen's relief and pension fund, or both, with the prior written approval of the board.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; 1985, No. 755, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806; Acts 1989, No. 459, § 1; 1989, No. 587, § 1; 2003, No. 1797, § 4; 2005, No. 248, § 1; 2011, No. 556, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Arkansas Insurance Code, referred to in this section, was originally enacted by Acts 1959, No. 148.
Acts 1959, No. 148 is codified as set out in the note following § 23-60-101.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added “Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section” at the beginning of (e)(1); and added (e)(2).

24-10-410. Delinquent payments.

If any political subdivision fails to make any payment due the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System for a period of ten (10) days after the payment is due, the political subdivision shall become delinquent, and the delinquency shall be certified by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System to the Treasurer of State.

Until the delinquency, together with regular interest, is satisfied, the Treasurer of State is authorized and directed to withhold all moneys due the political subdivision by the state.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3806; Acts 1987, No. 271, § 1.

24-10-411. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning transfer of subsidy account funds, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 609, § 3 and Acts 2007, No. 1056, § 5. The section was derived from Acts 1993, No. 1130, § 2.

Subchapter 5
— Credited Service

Effective Dates.

Acts 1987, No. 357, § 7: Mar. 23, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is in the best interest of the public health, welfare and safety that members in the public safety category of the Public Employees Retirement System should be permitted to transfer to another employment protecting the public health and safety and that current retirement laws discourage said transfers. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 485, § 12: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that public safety members for the Public Employees' Retirement System earn credit at one and one-half times the normal rate of service credit; that the dollar cost to the System of this service credit is too expensive and is escalating with the addition of other groups of employees as public safety members; and that it is necessary to restrain the future use and costs to the System of this service credit and to implement this act at the beginning of the States' fiscal year. Therefore, in order to reduce the financial burden on the Public Employees Retirement System, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 1352, § 5: Apr. 11, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present law pertaining to the purchase of credited service in the Local Police and Fire Retirement System by members who have prior service with a local government covered by a municipal police or fireman's pension fund is being misinterpreted; that such misinterpretation is resulting in an overcharge to members for the purchase of that prior service; that this act clarifies that law; that until this act goes into effect confusion will continue and persons seeking to purchase the former service will continue to be overcharged; and therefore this act should go into effect as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 883, § 6: Mar. 29, 1999. The emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System should be entitled to purchase credited service for military service; that this act corrects an inequity in the retirement system and should be given immediate effect. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2007, No. 610, § 3: Mar. 28, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System laws concerning the uniformed contribution rate for volunteer locations and the amount of prior service recognized for new volunteer departments need to be updated to meet the financial objectives of the system; that the sooner these changes are made, the sooner these locations and departments may reap the benefits of this act; and that this act is necessary because time is of the essence so the system may operate efficiently and equitably. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 17, § 7: Feb. 9, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to account for changes in the economy, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 91, § 2: Feb. 23, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System is in place to provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas, that the statutes need amending to update provisions concerning service credit for former military personnel, and that these citizens need to be immediately covered by these changes. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 40, § 18: Feb. 6, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1065, § 15, as amended by Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 1: Apr. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the local police and fire retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1444, § 2: Apr. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 1065 of 2013 was enacted with an erroneous emergency clause; that the error needs to be rectified as quickly as possible to effect the will of the General Assembly; and that this act is immediately necessary because it will correct and address the error found in the emergency clause of Act 1065 of 2013. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 178, § 9: Mar. 31, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System are complex; that the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System must be able to meet the needs of its members; that these statutes are imminently in need of revision and updating in order to conform with competent public pension policy and prevent any possible exploitation of the benefit structure of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System; that the calculation of certain retirement benefits is in need of clarification; that there is a need for certainty with regard to benefit accruals that are applicable to new members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly management of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on March 31, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 988, § 2: Jan. 1, 2020.

24-10-501. Paid and volunteer service.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall fix and determine by rules the number of years and months of paid service to be credited to each member for his or her employment as an employee.

In no case shall one (1) month of paid service credit be credited for any one (1) calendar month after the operative date for which an employee's pay is less than the minimum amount specified in this chapter, nor shall more than one (1) year of service be credited to any member for all covered employment rendered by him or her in any one (1) calendar year, unless the service credit is volunteer service credited under the employer as provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

Each employer shall regularly report to the board the calendar months of covered employment by each of its members that the employer wishes to be credited to the member as volunteer service.

The board shall credit the member with the volunteer service.

Beginning January 1, 2010, the board may credit a member both with volunteer service and with paid service when the member earns the service credit simultaneously.

For purposes of subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section:

A member is limited to earning volunteer service with only one (1) covered employer at a time; and

A member shall not earn volunteer service if the member is entitled to paid service for the same work.

Not later than ten (10) calendar days from and after the date an employer covers its employees and before the retirement of a member included in the employees so covered, the employer shall certify to the board the periods of employment of each of its members to be considered for credit as paid service and for credit as volunteer service.

Beginning January 1, 2008, employers shall be limited to recognizing a maximum of four (4) years of prior volunteer service credit.

No prior service shall be certified under this subsection by an employer for any member unless he or she was employed by the employer within the one-year period immediately preceding the date an employer covers its employees and unless he or she is continuously employed by the employer:

From and after that date for one (1) year;

Until his or her death; or

Until his or her total and permanent disability, whichever is earliest.

Beginning January 1, 2012, prior service credit or volunteer service credit shall not be certified under this subsection.

Anything contained herein to the contrary notwithstanding, not later than June 30, 1995, an employer with employees who were not accruing service credit because of the age-related limitation on credited service in subsections (a) and (b) of this section in existence prior to July 28, 1995, and who are or would accrue service credit without such limitations on credited service shall certify to the board the period or periods of previous employment of each such employee to be considered for credited service, and such previous employment shall be considered for credited service, provided the employee pays to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System by December 31, 1995, the total member contributions he or she would have contributed to the system had such an age-related limitation not been in effect.

A member who is hired on or after July 1, 2019, may be covered by only one (1) employer until he or she accrues ten (10) years of actual service credit in the system.

After a member accrues ten (10) years of actual service credit in the system, the member may only accrue a maximum of five (5) additional years of the service credit described under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3804; Acts 1995, No. 642, § 2; 1999, No. 902, § 1; 2003, No. 479, § 1; 2003, No. 1367, § 1; 2007, No. 610, § 2; 2009, No. 1278, § 1; 2011, No. 979, § 2; 2019, No. 178, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “by rules” in (a)(1); substituted “the employer” for “another employer” near the end of (a)(2); and rewrote (b)(2) and (b)(3).

The 2011 amendment added (c)(4).

The 2019 amendment, in (c)(1), substituted “ten (10) calendar days” for “one (1) year” and deleted “prior” preceding “employment”; and added (e).

24-10-502. Military service.

In the event a member who while an employee enters the United States Armed Forces during any period of compulsory or voluntary military service, the armed service actually served by him or her shall be credited him or her as service under this subchapter.

In any case of doubt as to the period of armed service to be so credited a member under this section, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall have final power to determine the period.

Except for service credited under subsection (d) of this section, no person shall be credited with a total of more than five (5) years of armed service.

During the period of armed service and until the member's return as an employee, his or her contributions to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall be suspended, and any balance remaining to his or her credit in the system shall be accumulated at regular interest.

Under section 4312 of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312 in effect October 13, 1996, a member who leaves covered employment to serve in the uniformed services of the United States after giving notice to the employer and who returns to employment shall be treated as not having incurred a break in service with the employer.

The employer shall certify to the system that reemployment was in accordance with section 4312 of the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38 U.S.C. § 4312.

Under this subsection, the uniformed services of the United States are limited to the United States Armed Forces, the Army National Guard and Air National Guard when engaged in active duty for training, state active duty, inactive duty training, or full-time National Guard duty, the United States Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service, and any other category of persons designated by the President of the United States in time of war or national emergency.

The cumulative length of the absence from a position of employment with the employer by reason of service in the uniformed services for which service credit will be given shall not exceed five (5) years.

A member whose uniformed service is honorably terminated and who reports for reemployment under this subsection within the time provided in section 4312 shall be entitled to accrue benefits for the time the member served in the uniformed services by paying the employee contributions required by § 24-10-404, if any, within the time provided in section 4312, and by repaying any amount the member may have previously withdrawn from the system, with interest.

An employer reemploying a member under this subsection shall pay to the system the employer contributions due for the time the member served in the uniformed services as required by § 24-10-405.

However, if a member does not pay the employee contributions due, then no employer contributions are due.

For the purposes of determining the employee and employer contributions due, the member's compensation during the period of service in the uniformed services shall be computed at:

The rate the member would have received if the member had not served in the uniformed services; or

The member's average compensation level during the twelve-month period, or shorter if applicable, immediately preceding the service.

Unless both employee and employer contributions are paid, the member shall not be entitled to any accrued benefits for the time served in the uniformed services.

If a member dies on or after January 1, 2007, while performing qualified military service under the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, Pub. L. No. 103-353, the member shall be treated as though he or she resumed covered employment on the day before the day of death.

For a member who had not attained a vested status in the system, sufficient service credit shall accrue to permit the member to become vested.

For a member who had attained a vested status, additional service credit accrual shall not occur.

In all cases, the eligible benefit awarded by the system under this section shall be a nonduty death benefit.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3804; Acts 1995, No. 641, § 1; 2003, No. 474, § 1; 2011, No. 17, § 4; 2013, No. 40, § 5; 2019, No. 474, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (d)(8).

The 2013 amendment, in (d)(1)(A), deleted “the requirements of” preceding “section 4312” and inserted “Rights”; substituted “uniformed” for “unformed” in (d)(3); and substituted “Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994” for “USERRA” in (d)(8)(A).

The 2019 amendment, in (d)(2), inserted “state active duty” and substituted “United States Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service” for “commissioned corps of the United States Public Health Service”.

24-10-503. Disability.

In the event a member in covered employment becomes totally physically or mentally incapacitated for his or her duty as an employee as the natural and proximate result of a personal injury or disease which has arisen out of and in the course of his or her actual performance of duty as an employee, in the event the disability will probably not be permanent, and in the event periodic payments are payable under any workers' compensation or similar law on account of the same disability, then the disability time shall be credited as service under this subchapter upon proper application filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System by or on behalf of the member.

All determinations concerning the nature of the disability shall be made by the board.

During the period of disability, his or her contributions based on reportable pays to the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System shall continue, and any balance remaining to his or her credit in the system shall continue to accrue regular interest.

Service credit granted under this section shall not be considered as credited service for the purpose of determining the member's final average pay.

Should the member die while so disabled, he or she shall be considered a member in covered employment at the time of death.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3804; Acts 2013, No. 40, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “proper” for “written” in (a); in (c), added “based on reportable pays”, replaced “be suspended” with “continue”, and replaced “be accumulated at” with “continue to accrue”; and substituted “member” for “person” in (e).

24-10-504. Forfeiture and restoration. [Effective until January 1, 2020.]

When a member is no longer employed by any employer in covered employment, he or she shall cease to be a member of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, upon termination of his or her membership his or her credited service shall be forfeited by him or her.

If the person becomes reemployed by any employer in covered employment, he or she shall again become a member of the system under subdivision (a)(4) of this section.

Upon his or her reemployment, his or her credited service last forfeited by him or her shall be restored to his or her credit, but only if he or she returns to the system the amount, if any, he or she withdrew from the system, together with regular interest from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment.

Upon a member's retirement, he or she shall cease to be a member.

Except under subdivision (b)(3) of this section or as otherwise provided in this chapter, he or she shall not again become a member of the system.

Upon a member's retirement for a period of not less than ninety (90) days, the member may return to volunteer service with a covered employer and may continue to draw the retirant's annuity if the retirant desires to return to the covered employer and voluntarily waives further service credit in the system or in any other police or firefighter-related pension fund.

Should a former member entitled to a vested annuity provided for in § 24-10-611 reenter covered employment before becoming a retirant, he or she shall cease to be entitled to a vested annuity and shall become a member, with his or her previous credited service reactivated and to be increased by the reemployment.

If a former member entitled to a vested annuity under § 24-10-611 reenters covered employment after becoming a retirant, the former member may again become a member with previous credited service restored and increased by the period of reemployment, but only if the former member:

Was not a participant in the Local Police and Fire Deferred Retirement Option Plan under § 24-10-701;

Was a retirant for at least thirty (30) days; and

Remains reemployed for at least twelve (12) months.

During the time of reemployment, the retirement benefits shall not be paid.

The former member may exercise the reemployment option under this subdivision (c)(2) one (1) time only.

At the end of the period of reemployment, the retirement benefit will be recalculated using service time, including the reemployment service, and final average pay.

However, the final average pay shall be the same final average pay used initially to calculate the retirement benefit unless the period of reemployment lasts at least thirty-six (36) months, in which case the final average pay will be recalculated as defined under § 24-10-102(17).

Upon the retirement of a member whose credited service results from employment with more than one (1) employer, the amount of his or her annuity shall be based upon his or her total credited service in force at the time of his or her retirement and his or her final average pay during the total credited service.

Each employer shall be responsible financially, within the provisions of this chapter, for the portion of the annuity based upon the service credited the member for employment with the employer, and the benefit program to be applied to each portion of credited service shall be the benefit program the employer had in effect at the time the member left the employment of the employer.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 364, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3804; Acts 1999, No. 710, § 1; 2003, No. 476, § 1; 2003, No. 1733, § 1; 2013, No. 40, § 7.

Publisher's Notes.

For text of section effective January 1, 2020, see the following version.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “waives” for “agrees to sign a waiver to earning any” in (b)(3); added present (c)(2)(A)(i) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; redesignated (c)(2)(D)(1) and (c)(2)(D)(2) as (c)(2)(D)(i) and (c)(2)(D)(ii); substituted “§ 24-10-102(17)” for “§ 24-10-102(15)” in (c)(2)(D)(ii); and deleted (e).